Utah statutes.
32A-4-101 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission's power to grant licenses --
Limitations.
(1)  Before a restaurant may sell or allow the consumption of liquor on its
premises, it shall first obtain a license from the commission as provided in
this part.
(2)  The commission may grant restaurant liquor licenses for the purpose of
establishing restaurant liquor outlets at places and in numbers it considers
proper for the storage, sale, and consumption of liquor on premises operated
as public restaurants.
(3) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (3) and Subsection
32A-4a-201(2), the total number of restaurant liquor licenses may not at any
time aggregate more than that number determined by dividing the population of
the state by 5,200.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (3), population shall be determined by:
(i)  the most recent United States decennial or special census; or
(ii)  another population determination made by the United States or state
governments.
(c) (i)  The commission may grant seasonal restaurant liquor licenses
established in areas the commission considers necessary.
(ii)  A seasonal restaurant liquor license shall be for a period of six
consecutive months.
(iii)  A restaurant liquor license granted for operation during a summer time
period is known as a "Seasonal A" restaurant liquor license.  The period of
operation for a "Seasonal A" restaurant liquor license shall:
(A)  begin on May 1; and
(B)  end on October 31.
(iv)  A restaurant liquor license granted for operation during a winter time
period is known as a "Seasonal B" restaurant liquor license.  The period of
operation for a "Seasonal B" restaurant liquor license shall:
(A)  begin on November 1; and
(B)  end on April 30.
(v)  In determining the number of restaurant liquor licenses that the
commission may issue under this section:
(A)  a seasonal license is counted as one-half of one restaurant liquor
license; and
(B)  each "Seasonal A" license shall be paired with a "Seasonal B" license.
(d) (i)  If the location, design, and construction of a hotel may require more
than one restaurant liquor sales location within the hotel to serve the public
convenience, the commission may authorize the sale of liquor at as many as
three restaurant locations within the hotel under one license if:
(A)  the hotel has a minimum of 150 guest rooms; and
(B)  all locations under the license are:
(I)  within the same hotel facility; and
(II)  on premises that are managed or operated and owned or leased by the
licensee.
(ii)  A facility other than a hotel shall have a separate restaurant liquor
license for each restaurant where liquor is sold.
(4) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this Subsection (4), the premises of
a restaurant liquor license may not be established:
(i)  within 600 feet of a community location, as measured by the method in
Subsection (4)(f);
(ii)  within 200 feet of a community location, measured in a straight line
from the nearest entrance of the proposed outlet to the nearest property
boundary of the community location.
(b)  With respect to the establishment of a restaurant liquor license, the
commission may authorize a variance to reduce the proximity requirement of
Subsection (4)(a)(i) if:
(i)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(ii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a
restaurant liquor license in the community are limited;
(iii)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(iv)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances
and the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the restaurant liquor license would not be
detrimental to the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community;
and
(v) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the
restaurant is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (4)(b)(v)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a restaurant liquor license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the restaurant is to be
located for establishing a restaurant liquor license to satisfy the unmet
demand described in Subsection (4)(b)(v)(B)(I).
(c)  With respect to the establishment of a restaurant liquor license, the
commission may authorize a variance that reduces the proximity requirement of
Subsection (4)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the community location at issue is:
(A)  a public library; or
(B)  a public park;
(ii)  the local authority grants its written consent to the variance;
(iii)  the commission finds that alternative locations for establishing a
restaurant liquor license in the community are limited;
(iv)  a public hearing is held in the city, town, or county, and where
practical in the neighborhood concerned;
(v)  after giving full consideration to all of the attending circumstances and
the policies stated in Subsections 32A-1-104(3) and (4), the commission
determines that establishing the restaurant liquor license would not be
detrimental to the public health, peace, safety, and welfare of the community;
and
(vi) (A)  the community location governing authority gives its written consent
to the variance; or
(B)  when written consent is not given by the community location governing
authority, the commission finds that the applicant has established that:
(I)  there is substantial unmet public demand to consume alcohol in a public
setting within the geographic boundary of the local authority in which the
restaurant is to be located;
(II)  there is no reasonably viable alternative for satisfying substantial
unmet demand described in Subsection (4)(c)(vi)(B)(I) other than through the
establishment of a restaurant liquor license; and
(III)  there is no reasonably viable alternative location within the
geographic boundary of the local authority in which the restaurant is to be
located for establishing a restaurant liquor license to satisfy the unmet
demand described in Subsection (4)(c)(vi)(B)(I).
(d)  With respect to the premises of a restaurant liquor license granted by
the commission that undergoes a change of ownership, the commission may waive
or vary the proximity requirements of Subsection (4)(a) in considering whether
to grant a restaurant liquor license to the new owner of the premises if:
(i) (A)  the premises previously received a variance reducing the proximity
requirement of Subsection (4)(a)(i); or
(B)  the premises received a variance reducing the proximity requirement of
Subsection (4)(a)(ii) on or before May 4, 2008; or
(ii)  a variance from proximity requirements was otherwise allowed under this
title.
(e)  With respect to the premises of a restaurant liquor license granted by
the commission that undergoes a change of ownership, the commission shall
waive or vary the proximity requirements of Subsection (4)(a) in considering
whether to grant a restaurant liquor license to the new owner of the premises
if:
(i)  when a restaurant liquor license was granted to a previous owner, the
premises met the proximity requirements of Subsection (4)(a);
(ii)  the premises has had a restaurant liquor license at all times since the
restaurant liquor license described in Subsection (4)(e)(i) was granted
without a variance; and
(iii)  the community location located within the proximity requirements of
Subsection (4)(a) after the day on which the restaurant liquor license
described in Subsection (4)(e)(i) was granted.
(f)  The 600 foot limitation described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) is measured
from the nearest entrance of the outlet by following the shortest route of
ordinary pedestrian travel to the community location.
(5) (a)  Nothing in this section prevents the commission from considering the
proximity of any educational, religious, and recreational facility, or any
other relevant factor in reaching a decision on a proposed location.
(b)  For purposes of this Subsection (5), "educational facility" includes:
(i)  a nursery school;
(ii)  an infant day care center; and
(iii)  a trade and technical school.
